Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2

Tennessee Restitution Industries

41-6-201. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this part to:

Authorize the commissioner of correction to establish demonstration-type projects involving inmate labor and private industry to be known as Tennessee restitution industries;

Authorize the commissioner to contract with private industry to lease state land, improvements and facilities at adult correction institutions for the establishment of restitution industries;

Provide for the employment of the inmates of the institution by private industries and the term of employment; and

Designate the uses to be made of deductions from wages earned by inmate employees.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-2401.

Cross-References. Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board, § 41-22-404.

41-6-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction;

“Department” means the department of correction;

“P.I.E. program” means a joint venture authorized by the TRICOR board as provided for in § 41-22-116(e) for the employment of inmates by private industries;

“TRICOR” means the Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board which institutes inmate programs described in § 41-22-402; and

“TRICOR board” means the board created pursuant to § 41-22-404 with the authority to manage and operate TRICOR programs.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-2402; Acts 2010, ch. 796, § 1.

41-6-203. Scope of projects — Contracts with private enterprise — Inmate participation.

The commissioner may establish and implement within the boundary of the present correctional facilities now established, or facilities that may be established in the future, certain demonstration-type projects involving the employment of inmates of the institutions by private industry. The projects shall also provide for the delivery of supportive services to inmates participating in the demonstration projects, including, but not limited to, training, education and counseling.

In establishing projects, the commissioner may enter into agreements, by contract, and subject to procedures to be approved by the procurement commission. Any construction required under any contract or agreement shall not be by the state of Tennessee, but shall be by private enterprise with any private enterprise pursuant to which such private enterprise may establish, by construction, lease or otherwise, facilities at the main facility for the purpose of carrying out industrial or other operations authorized in this part. Private corporations and their employees, excluding inmates, must be of good moral character.

The inmates' participation shall be on a voluntary basis.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 3; T.C.A., § 41-2403; Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

41-6-204. Wages.

Any agreement pursuant to § 41-6-203 shall contain provisions assuring that the wages paid to inmates shall be no less than the mean wage for the applicable occupation under the “construction and extraction occupations” published in the Tennessee Occupational Wages Report, as defined in § 12-4-907.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 4; T.C.A., § 41-2404; Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 18 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2014.

41-6-205. Receipt by inmates — Rules and regulations — Unemployment compensation.

Any inmate of any institution employed pursuant to this part shall be entitled to receive, after deductions authorized in § 41-6-206 or under any law, wages earned by the inmate in performing work. Wages shall be made available to the inmate at those times the commissioner may prescribe pursuant to regulation, but in no event later than at the time of the inmate's release, by parole or otherwise, from confinement in a state penal or correctional institution.

The employment of inmates shall be subject to the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6.

As a condition of employment, inmates shall waive all rights to be included in the unemployment compensation program of the state.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 5; T.C.A., § 41-2405.

41-6-206. Deductions.

Any inmate employed pursuant to this part shall, in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner, pay from the wages received for work, and the commissioner may deduct from those wages, the following deductions, which shall not, in the aggregate, exceed eighty percent (80%) of gross wages and which shall be limited as follows:

Taxes, federal, state, local;

Reasonable charges for room and board, as determined by the commissioner;

Allocations for support of family pursuant to state statute, court order or agreement by the offender;

Contributions to any fund established by law to compensate the victims of crime of not more than twenty percent (20%) but not less than five percent (5%) of gross wages; and

All remaining wages to the inmate's personal trust fund.

Any amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall be payable in such manner as the commissioner may by regulations prescribe.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-2406; Acts 1991, ch. 78, § 4.

Cross-References. Criminal injuries compensation fund, § 40-24-107.

Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

41-6-207. Leasing land and facilities to private enterprise.

In administering this section, the commissioner, as a part of or in connection with any agreement made pursuant to § 41-6-203, may make available by lease or otherwise, land, together with improvements on the land, located at the prison facility, but within the exterior boundary of any state adult correction institution, for use by the private party to the agreement to provide employment in accordance with this chapter.

The lands, including improvements, shall be made available pursuant to such terms and conditions as the commissioner, the commissioner of finance and administration and the state building commission may prescribe. Any lease of land or of improvements or facilities entered into under authority of this section shall be for a primary term not to exceed five (5) years unless such lease is entered into by TRICOR with a private party under a P.I.E. program or service program in connection with a contract for employment of inmates developed and authorized by the TRICOR board and approved by the commissioner, the department of finance and administration, and the state building commission.

A lease may be renewed from year to year after expiration of the primary term upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner and the commissioner of finance and administration may prescribe.

Acts 1977, ch. 151, § 7; T.C.A., § 41-2407; Acts 2010, ch. 796, § 2.